Delaware, session 153, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 472, Volume 83 of the Laws of Delaware by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Section 3. This Act expires 3 years after its enactment into law; unless otherwise provided by a subsequent act of the General Assembly. SYNOPSIS In the 151st General Assembly, SS1 to SB 258 was passed, which permitted pet owners to pursue compensatory damages without limitation for veterinary bills incurred to care for a pet that was injured by the negligence, reckless, or intentional acts of another individual or that individual's pet. This act removes a sunset provision that would have these changes expire on October 14, 2025. Author: Senator Pettyjohn